Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142G.18, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Persons convicted of a crime of violence. new text end new text begin A person convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5, or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of those sections is disqualified from receiving MFIP. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.055, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Persons detained by law. (a) Medical assistance may be paid for an inmate of a correctional facility who is conditionally released as authorized under section 241.26, 244.065, or 631.425, if the individual does not require the security of a public detention facility and is housed in a halfway house or community correction center, or under house arrest and monitored by electronic surveillance in a residence approved by the commissioner of corrections, and if the individual meets the other eligibility requirements of this chapter. (b) An individual who is enrolled in medical assistance, and who is charged with a crime and incarcerated for less than 12 months shall be suspended from eligibility at the time of incarceration until the individual is released. Upon release, medical assistance eligibility is reinstated without reapplication using a reinstatement process and form, if the individual is otherwise eligible. (c) An individual, regardless of age, who is considered an inmate of a public institution as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 435.1010, and who meets the eligibility requirements in section 256B.056, is not eligible for medical assistance, except for covered services received while an inpatient in a medical institution as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 435.1010. Security issues, including costs, related to the inpatient treatment of an inmate are the responsibility of the entity with jurisdiction over the inmate. new text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), (b), or (c), medical assistance does not cover an individual convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5, or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of those sections. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.055, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Persons convicted of a crime of violence. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5, or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of those sections is ineligible to receive medical assistance. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.024, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Persons convicted of a crime of violence. new text end new text begin A person convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5, or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of those sections is ineligible to receive benefits under this chapter. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Persons convicted of a crime of violence. new text end new text begin A person convicted of a crime of violence as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 5, or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of those sections is not eligible for MinnesotaCare. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142G.18, subdivision 1, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06943 142G.18 PERSONS INELIGIBLE; VENDOR PAYMENTS. Subdivision 1. Person convicted of drug offenses. (a) An individual who has been convicted of a felony level drug offense during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification is subject to the following: (1) Benefits for the entire assistance unit must be paid in vendor form for shelter and utilities during any time the applicant is part of the assistance unit. (2) The convicted applicant or participant may be subject to random drug testing. Following any positive test for an illegal controlled substance, the county must provide information about substance use disorder treatment programs to the applicant or participant. (b) Applicants requesting only SNAP benefits or participants receiving only SNAP benefits, who have been convicted of a felony-level drug offense during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification may, if otherwise eligible, receive SNAP benefits. The convicted applicant or participant may be subject to random drug testing. Following a positive test for an illegal controlled substance, the county must provide information about substance use disorder treatment programs to the applicant or participant. (c) For the purposes of this subdivision, "drug offense" means a conviction that occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification of sections 152.021 to 152.025, 152.0261, 152.0262, 152.096, or 152.137. Drug offense also means a conviction in another jurisdiction of the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, if the conviction occurred during the previous ten years from the date of application or recertification and the conviction is for a crime that would be a felony if committed in Minnesota. (d) This subdivision does not apply for convictions or positive test results related to cannabis, marijuana, or tetrahydrocannabinols.